test/src/morphology/V-tolash_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - толаш: # Verb-am 'to come'
     толаш+V+Inf: толаш
     толаш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: толам
     толаш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: толат
     толаш+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: толеш
     толаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: толына
     толаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: толыда
     толаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: толыт

     толаш+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: тол
     толаш+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: толеп
#    
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg1: тольым
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3: тольыц
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3: тольы
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl1: толна
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3: толта
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3: толевӹ
     
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt1+ConNeg: тол
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Pl3+ConNeg: толеп
#    
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg1: толынам
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3: толынат
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Sg3: толын
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl1: толынна
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3: толында
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Pl3: толыныт
     
##   
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg1: толделам
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: толделат
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3: толде
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl1: толделна
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: толделда
     толаш+V+Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3: толделыт
##   
     толаш+V+Imprt+Sg3: тол
     толаш+V+Imprt+Sg3: толжы
     толаш+V+Imprt+Pl3: толда
     толаш+V+Imprt+Pl3: толышты
##   
     толаш+V+ImprtII+Sg2: толыма
     толаш+V+ImprtII+Pl2: толымада
##   
     толаш+V+Des+Sg1: толнем
     толаш+V+Des+Sg3: толнет
     толаш+V+Des+Sg3: толнежӹ
     толаш+V+Des+Pl1: толненӓ
     толаш+V+Des+Pl3: толнедӓ
     толаш+V+Des+Pl3: толнештӹ
     
     
